Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1033.
do enact as follows:AB1033,11Section 1. 30.01 (1ag) of the statutes is created to read:AB1033,2,3230.01 (1ag) “Aquaplane” includes the board upon which a person rides while 3wakesurfing.AB1033,24Section 2. 30.01 (1ah) of the statutes is created to read:AB1033,2,5530.01 (1ah) “Aquaplaning” includes wakesurfing.AB1033,36Section 3. 30.01 (6r) of the statutes is created to read:AB1033,2,7730.01 (6r) “Wakesurfing” means the activity of any of the following:AB1033,2,98(a) Surfing a motorboat’s wake, regardless of whether the person is being 9pulled by a tow rope attached to the motorboat that is producing the wake.AB1033,3,21(b) Operating a motorboat in a manner that creates a wake that is, or is 2intended to be, surfed by a person.AB1033,43Section 4. 30.69 (1) (a) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1033,3,6430.69 (1) (a) (intro.) Except as provided in par. (b) sub. (3m), no person may 5operate a motorboat towing a person on water skis, aquaplane, or similar device 6unless one of the following applies:AB1033,57Section 5. 30.69 (1) (b) of the statutes is renumbered 30.69 (3m) and 8amended to read:AB1033,3,12930.69 (3m) Competition exception. Paragraphs Subsections (1) (a), (ag), 10and (am) and (3) (cm) do not apply to duly authorized water ski or wakesurfing 11tournaments, competitions, exhibitions, or trials therefor, where adequate lighting 12is provided.AB1033,613Section 6. 30.69 (3) (cm) of the statutes is created to read:AB1033,3,151430.69 (3) (cm) No person may engage in wakesurfing unless all of the 15following apply:AB1033,3,18161. The motorboat used in wakesurfing is operated farther than 200 feet from 17a shoreline or a dock, pier, boathouse, or other structure located completely or partly 18on the body of water.AB1033,3,20192. The motorboat used in wakesurfing is operated farther than 200 feet from 20any person in the water or any occupied vessel.AB1033,3,22213. The person surfing on or across the wake of the motorboat or being towed 22on a board is wearing a personal flotation device prescribed by federal regulations.AB1033,723Section 7. 30.69 (3) (d) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1033,4,32430.69 (3) (d) Paragraphs (a) to (c) (cm) do not apply to pickup or drop areas 1that are marked with regulatory markers and that are open to operators of personal 2watercraft and to persons and motorboats engaged in water skiing, wakesurfing, or 3similar activity.AB1033,84Section 8. 30.74 (1) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1033,4,13530.74 (1) (a) The department shall establish a program of comprehensive 6courses on boating safety and operation. These courses shall be offered in 7cooperation with schools, including tribal schools, as defined in s. 115.001 (15m), 8private clubs and organizations, and may be offered by the department in areas 9where requested and where other sponsorship is unavailable. The department 10shall issue certificates to persons 10 years of age or older successfully completing 11such courses. The department shall prescribe the course content and the form of 12the certificate, except that the course shall include education on wakesurfing and 13the proper use of and operation of motorboats used in wakesurfing.AB1033,4,1414